West Virginia, session 2025, HB2357.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Crimes Against The Person. §61-2-3. Penalty for murder of second degree. Murder of the second degree shall be punished by a definite term of imprisonment in the penitentiary which is not less than ten 15 nor more than forty 60 years. A person imprisoned pursuant to the provisions of this section is not eligible for parole prior to having served a minimum of ten 15 years of his or her sentence or the minimum period required by the §62-12-13 of this code, whichever is greater.